Florida, session 2026, SB424.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âParagraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) and 19 paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (7) of section 1002.333, 20 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 21 1002.333âPersistently low-performing schools.â 22 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 23 (c)ââPersistently low-performing schoolâ means a school 24 that meets at least one of the following criteria: 25 1.âA school that has earned three grades lower than a âC,â 26 pursuant to s. 1008.34, in at least 3 of the previous 5 years 27 that the school received a grade and has not earned a grade of 28 âBâ or higher in the most recent 2 school years; or 29 2.âA school that was closed pursuant to s. 1008.33(4) 30 within 2 years after the submission of a notice of intent; or 31 3.âA school in the bottom 10 percent in at least 2 of the 32 previous 3 years for student performance on the end-of-year 33 administration of the coordinated screening and progress 34 monitoring system for grade 3 English Language Arts or grade 4 35 mathematics as prescribed in s. 1008.22(3)(a)2. 36 (d)ââSchool of hopeâ means: 37 1.âA charter school operated by a hope operator which: 38 a.âServes students from one or more persistently low 39 performing schools or students who reside in a Florida 40 Opportunity Zone; and 41 b.âIs located in a Florida Opportunity Zone or in the 42 attendance zone of a persistently low-performing school or 43 within a 5-mile radius of such school, whichever is greater. A 44 school of hope may be located outside of a Florida Opportunity 45 Zone or persistently low-performing school attendance zone if 46 the school district does not have underused, vacant, or surplus 47 property available for the hope operator to use within a Florida 48 Opportunity Zone or persistently low-performing school 49 attendance zone; and 50 c.âIs a Title I eligible school; or 51 2.âA school operated by a hope operator pursuant to s. 52 1008.33(4)(b)3. 53 (7)âFACILITIES.â 54 (a)âA school of hope shall use facilities that comply with 55 the Florida Building Code, except for the State Requirements for 56 Educational Facilities. A school of hope that uses school 57 district facilities must comply with the State Requirements for 58 Educational Facilities only if the school district and the hope 59 operator have entered into a mutual management plan for the 60 reasonable maintenance of such facilities. The mutual management 61 plan must shall contain a provision by which the district school 62 board agrees to maintain the school facilities in the same 63 manner as its other public schools within the district. A school 64 of hope may colocate with another school in a public school 65 facility. The school district must permit any school of hope to 66 use all or part of underused, vacant, or surplus school district 67 facilities, and receive facility-related services, pursuant to 68 State Board of Education rule. Students enrolled in the school 69 of hope shall be included in the districtâs total capital outlay 70 full-time equivalent membership for the purpose of s. 1013.62 71 and for calculating the Public Education Capital Outlay 72 maintenance funds or any other maintenance funds for the 73 facility. The local governing authority may shall not adopt or 74 impose any local building requirements or site-development 75 restrictions, such as parking and site-size criteria, student 76 enrollment, and occupant load, that are addressed by and more 77 stringent than those found in the State Requirements for 78 Educational Facilities of the Florida Building Code. A local 79 governing authority shall must treat schools of hope equitably 80 in comparison to similar requirements, restrictions, and site 81 planning processes imposed upon public schools. The agency 82 having jurisdiction for inspection of a facility and issuance of 83 a certificate of occupancy or use is shall be the local 84 municipality or, if in an unincorporated area, the county 85 governing authority. If an official or employee of the local 86 governing authority refuses to comply with this paragraph, the 87 aggrieved school or entity has an immediate right to bring an 88 action in circuit court to enforce its rights by injunction. An 89 aggrieved party that receives injunctive relief may be awarded 90 reasonable attorney fees and court costs. 91 (d)âNo later than January 1, the department shall annually 92 provide to school districts a list of all underused, vacant, or 93 surplus facilities owned or operated by the school district as 94 reported in the Florida Inventory of School Houses. A school 95 district may provide evidence to the department that a facility 96 includes prekindergarten students who are not reported for 97 funding in the Florida Education Finance Program or that the 98 list contains errors or omissions within 30 days after receipt 99 of the list. By each April 1, the department shall update and 100 publish a final list of all underused, vacant, or surplus 101 facilities owned or operated by each school district, based upon 102 updated information provided by each school district. A hope 103 operator establishing a school of hope may use an educational 104 facility identified in this paragraph at no cost. A hope 105 operator using a facility pursuant to this paragraph may not 106 sell or dispose of such facility without the written permission 107 of the school district. For purposes of this paragraph, the term 108 âunderused, vacant, or surplus facilityâ means an entire 109 facility or portion thereof which is not fully used or is used 110 irregularly or intermittently by the school district for 111 instructional or program use. 112 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.